Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.09.060

Abandonment of entity conversion.

(1) Unless otherwise provided in a plan of entity conversion of a domestic corporation, after the plan of entity conversion has been adopted and approved as required by this chapter, and at any time before the articles of entity conversion have become effective, the planned conversion may be abandoned by the board of directors without action by the shareholders.

(2) If any entity conversion is abandoned after articles of entity conversion have been filed with the secretary of state but before the entity conversion has become effective, a statement that the entity conversion has been abandoned in accordance with this section, executed by an officer or other duly authorized representative, must be delivered to the secretary of state for filing prior to the effective date of the entity conversion and in accordance with RCW 23.95.215. Upon filing, the statement takes effect and the entity conversion is deemed abandoned and may not become effective.

[ 2020 c 57 s 67; 2015 c 176 s 2123; 2014 c 83 s 14.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.